Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 07. Medical Assistance for Needy Persons.
Sec. 47.07.070.
Payment rates for health facilities.

The department shall, by regulation, set rates of payment for health facilities under this chapter and AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1396 (Title XIX, Social Security Act, Medical Assistance) and this section. A rate established under this section takes effect under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) but not until approved in writing by the commissioner. The commissioner may delegate the performance of these functions.

In determining the rates of payment for health facilities for a fiscal year, the department shall, within the limit of appropriations made by the legislature for the department’s programs under this chapter and under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

for that fiscal year, including anticipated available federal revenue for that fiscal year, set rates for facilities that are based on

reasonable costs related to patient care; and

audit and inspection results and reports, when the audit or inspection is conducted under AS

47.07.074

.

This section does not apply to the minimum daily reimbursement rate specified by law under AS

47.24.017

or AS

47.25.195(e)

for assisted living homes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 182 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 95 SLA 1983; am § 7 ch 105 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1989; am E.O. No. 72 § 4 (1989); am §§ 1, 2 ch 153 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 95 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For transitional provision relating to regulations adopted under AS

47.07.070

before its 2003 repeal and reenactment, see § 7, ch. 28, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For physician services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 2.

For long-term care — intermediate care facilities and skilled nursing facilities, see 7 AAC 43, art. 3.

For intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded or persons with related conditions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 4.

For hospital services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 5.

For inpatient psychiatric services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 10.

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

For home health care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 20.

For rural health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 22.

For federally qualified health centers, see 7 AAC 43, art. 23.

For outpatient surgical clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 24.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, rewrote this section.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 28, SLA 2003 (SB 108), see 2003 Senate Journal 393—394.

Sec. 47.07.071.
Reports by health facilities.

After the end of each fiscal year of a health facility, the facility shall submit to the department a report on the facility’s financial performance during the fiscal year. The commissioner shall, by regulation, establish the date by which this financial report is due.

History.

(§ 4 ch 95 SLA 1983; am E.O. No. 72 § 5 (1989); am § 2 ch 95 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

Sec. 47.07.072.
Report by the department. [Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 47.07.073.
Uniform accounting, budgeting, and reporting.

The department by regulation shall require a uniform system of accounting, budgeting, and reporting for health facilities receiving payments under this chapter. The regulations must provide for reporting revenues, expenses, assets, liabilities, units of service, and other items considered necessary by the department to implement this chapter.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 28 SLA 2003.]

The department may waive or modify a requirement for accounting, budgeting, or reporting for a health facility if waiver or modification is consistent with the policies of this chapter.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the department may, by regulation, modify the system of accounting, budgeting, and reporting required under this section for a health facility having fewer than 25 acute care beds in order to reduce the operating costs of that facility.

History.

(§ 4 ch 95 SLA 1983; am E.O. No. 72 § 7 (1989); am §§ 2 — 4, 6 ch 28 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

For rural health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 22.

For federally qualified health centers, see 7 AAC 43, art. 23.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, in subsection (a) deleted “financial” preceding “reporting” and “prospective” preceding “payments” in the first sentence, added the language beginning “, and other items” to the end of the last sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read “The department shall specify the date the system becomes effective for each health facility”; repealed subsection (b); rewrote subsection (c); and in subsection (d) deleted “financial” preceding “reporting.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 28, SLA 2003 (SB 108), see 2003 Senate Journal 393—394.

Sec. 47.07.074.
Audits and inspections.

As a condition of obtaining payment under AS

47.07.070

, a health facility shall allow

the department reasonable access to the records of medical assistance recipients and providers; and

audit and inspection of the records by state and federal agencies.

The department may establish the scope and timing of audits under this chapter. The department may provide that audits will be conducted less frequently than annually.

History.

(§ 4 ch 95 SLA 1983; am §§ 3, 4 ch 95 SLA 1997; am § 5 ch 28 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 66 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

For rural health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 22.

For federally qualified health centers, see 7 AAC 43, art. 23.

For program participation — administrative remedies and sanctions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 27.

For audit and appeal, see 7 AAC 43, art. 31.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, deleted “and the commission” following “department” in paragraph (a)(1).

The second 2003 amendment, effective September 9, 2003, in subsection (a) substituted “records of medical assistance recipients and providers” for “financial records of medical assistance beneficiaries” in paragraph (1) and in paragraph (2) substituted “the records” for “financial records.”

Sec. 47.07.075.
Administrative procedure.

Actions of the department regarding health facility payment rates under this chapter and AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

are subject to provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) except as provided in (b) of this section, and the hearing for an appeal must be conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

).

The commissioner shall, by regulation, establish time limits applicable to the various phases of an administrative appeal process involving an appeal of the amount of a payment rate set by the department for a facility. The time limits set under the regulations supersede conflicting time limits in AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

. The regulations must provide that

a hearing for an appeal described in this subsection must be scheduled under AS

44.62.410

to occur no more than 120 days after written notice of rate appeal has been received by the department from a facility unless the facility requests a delay or good cause for the delay is demonstrated to the satisfaction of the hearing officer;

the commissioner must, within 30 days after receiving the recommendation of the hearing officer, either render a decision in the case or refer the case back to a hearing officer for additional findings;

if either time limit set under (1) or (2) of this subsection is not met, the department shall report the noncompliance to the legislature and the governor by the following January 20 with an explanation of the length of delay, reasons for the delay, and proposed corrective action by the department to ameliorate the causes of delay.

History.

(§ 4 ch 95 SLA 1983; am E.O. No. 72 § 8 (1989); am §§ 3, 4 ch 153 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 116, § 7 (2012))

Cross references. —

For transition provisions for pending proceedings, rights, liabilities, or obligations under this section in effect on July 1, 2012, and regulations implementing this section in effect on July 1, 2012, see § 16, E.O. No. 116, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (a), added “, and the hearing for an appeal must be conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” following “as provided in (b) of this section”.

Sec. 47.07.076.
Reports to legislature.

The department and the attorney general shall annually prepare a report relating to the medical assistance program under this chapter. The report must include the following information:

the amount and source of funds used to prevent or prosecute fraud, abuse, payment errors, and errors in eligibility determinations for the previous fiscal year;

actions taken to address fraud, abuse, payment errors, and errors in eligibility determinations during the previous fiscal year;

specific examples of fraud or abuse that were prevented or prosecuted;

identification of vulnerabilities in the medical assistance program, including any vulnerabilities identified by independent auditors with whom the department contracts under AS

47.05.200

;

initiatives the department has taken to prevent fraud or abuse;

recommendations to increase effectiveness in preventing and prosecuting fraud and abuse;

the return to the state for every dollar expended by the department and the attorney general to prevent and prosecute fraud and abuse;

the most recent payment error rate measurement report for the medical assistance program, including fee for service programs and pilot or demonstration projects; the report must also explain the reasons for the payment errors and the total amount of state and federal funds paid in error during the reporting period and not recovered by the department at the time of the report;

results from the Medicaid Eligibility Quality Control program.

On or before November 15 of each year, the department shall submit the report required under (a) of this section to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available.

[Repealed, §§ 53, 61(f), 66 ch 25 SLA 2016.]

History.

(§ 47 ch 25 SLA 2016; am §§ 53, 61(f), 66 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 47, ch. 25, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect July 1, 2016.

Sec. 47.07.080.
[Renumbered as AS 47.07.900.]

Sec. 47.07.085.
Supplemental reimbursement for emergency medical transportation services.

The department shall develop a program to provide supplemental reimbursement to eligible emergency medical transportation service providers for the cost of providing services to medical assistance recipients. Except as provided in (b) of this section, the amount of the supplemental reimbursement paid to a provider must be equal to the amount of federal financial participation that the department receives for the nonfederal matching funds paid by the provider through intergovernmental transfers or certified public expenditures, less any administrative fee described in (d) or (e) of this section. Under the program, the department shall use intergovernmental transfers, or certified public expenditures, or both, for the nonfederal share of emergency medical transportation services that are eligible for federal financial participation under the medical assistance program.

The amount a provider receives in supplemental reimbursements under the program, when combined with the amount the provider receives from all other sources, including medical assistance reimbursement under the state plan, may not exceed the provider’s actual cost for providing emergency medical transportation services to medical assistance recipients.

An emergency medical transportation service provider is eligible to participate in the program if the provider

is enrolled with the department as a medical assistance provider;

voluntarily enters into an agreement with the department to participate in the program;

is owned or operated by the state, a political subdivision of the state, or a federally recognized tribe or tribal organization;

charges for emergency medical transportation services on a fee-for- service or other federally permissible basis; and

certifies that the provider’s expenditures for emergency medical transportation services qualify for federal financial participation.

If the department authorizes the use of intergovernmental transfers under the program, the department shall charge an administrative fee to a provider to cover the department’s costs of administering the program. The administrative fee may not exceed 20 percent of the nonfederal share the provider pays to the department. A provider may include the administrative fee in the provider’s cost for providing an emergency medical transportation service to a medical assistance recipient.

If the department authorizes the use of certified public expenditures under the program, the department may establish an administrative fee for a provider. If the department establishes an administrative fee under this subsection, the department may allow a provider to include the administrative fee in the provider’s cost for providing an emergency medical transportation service to a medical assistance recipient.

This section authorizes the department to provide supplemental reimbursements to a ground, water, or air emergency medical transportation service provider only if the United States Department of Health and Human Services approves payments to that type of emergency medical transportation service provider.

If the United States Department of Health and Human Services revokes approval of the program, the department shall provide notice to the legislature. The department shall submit written notice to the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives as early as possible after the United States Department of Health and Human Services expresses its intent to revoke approval of the program.

Supplemental reimbursement payments are subject to appropriation.

In this section,

“program” means the supplemental reimbursement program developed by the department under this section;

“provider” means an eligible emergency medical transportation service provider;

“state plan” means the state plan for medical assistance coverage developed under AS

47.07.040

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 34 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 34, SLA 2018 makes this section effective June 21, 2018, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Secs. 47.07.110 — 47.07.190.
Medicaid Rate Advisory Commission. [Repealed, § 6 ch 28 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.07.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

[Repealed, § 4 ch 52 SLA 2006.]

“advanced practice registered nurse services” means services furnished by a person who is licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse under AS

08.68.850

that are within the scope of regulations adopted under AS

08.68.100(a)

, whether or not the person is under the supervision of, or associated with, a physician or other health care provider;

“chiropractic services” includes only services that are provided by a chiropractor licensed under AS 08.20 that consist of treatment by means of manual manipulation of the spine and x-rays necessary for treatment;

“clinic services” means services provided by state-approved outpatient community mental health clinics, state-operated community mental health clinics, outpatient surgical care centers, and physician clinics;

“clinical social workers’ services” means clinical social work services provided by a person licensed as a clinical social worker under AS 08.95;

[Repealed, § 6 ch 28 SLA 2003.]

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“emergency hospital services” means services that

are necessary to prevent the death or serious impairment of the health of the individual; and

because of the threat to the life or health of the individual, necessitate the use of the most accessible hospital available that is equipped to furnish the services, even if the hospital does not currently meet

the conditions for participation under Medicare; or

the definitions of inpatient or outpatient hospital services under 42 C.F.R. 440.10 and 440.20;

“emotionally disturbed or chronically mentally ill adults” includes only persons who receive mental health services from an entity that has a contract to provide community mental health services under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

;

“eyeglasses” are lenses, including frames when necessary, and other aids to vision prescribed by a physician skilled in diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever the patient may select, to aid or improve vision;

“health facility” includes a

hospital, skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, rehabilitation facility, inpatient psychiatric facility, home health agency, rural health clinic, and outpatient surgical clinic; and

birthing center if birthing centers are authorized for coverage under the state plan approved under AS

47.07.040

by the United States Department of Health and Human Services;

“hospice care” means services to a terminally ill individual of the type and under the circumstances described in 42 U.S.C. 1396d(o), as amended, and applicable federal regulations;

“midwife services” means services within the practice of midwifery, as defined in AS

08.65.190

, that are performed by a certified direct-entry midwife, and miscellaneous fees, other than facility fees, for birth kits, oxygen, and other ancillary expenses necessary for a birth attended by a certified direct-entry midwife;

[Repealed, § 60 ch 33 SLA 2016.]

“personal care services in a recipient’s home” means services authorized under a service plan in accordance with applicable federal and state law;

“professional counseling services” means services within the practice of professional counseling provided by a person licensed as a professional counselor under AS 08.29; professional counseling services may be provided at a facility that is not a provider of clinic services.

“psychologists’ services” means services within the practice of psychology provided by a person licensed as a psychologist or psychological associate under AS 08.86;

“rehabilitative services” means services for substance abusers and emotionally disturbed or chronically mentally ill adults provided by

a drug or alcohol treatment center; or

an outpatient community mental health clinic;

“substance abuser” means a person who

is an alcoholic, as defined in AS

47.37.270

;

participates in inhalant abuse, as defined in AS

47.37.270

; or

misuses illegal or prescription drugs;

“targeted case management services” means services for populations designated by the department in regulation that will assist individuals eligible for medical assistance under this chapter in gaining access to needed medical, social, educational, or other services provided to persons through the department;

History.

(am E.O. No. 72 § 12 (1989); § 1 ch 182 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 221 SLA 1976; am § 26 ch 40 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 132 SLA 1982; am §§ 5, 10 ch 95 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 20 SLA 1986; am §§ 9, 10 ch 105 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 70 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 38 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 110 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 51 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 130 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 28 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 93 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 2005; am § 4 ch 52 SLA 2006; am §§ 1, 2 ch 35 SLA 2009; am § 20 ch 42 SLA 2013; am §§ 48, 49 ch 25 SLA 2016; am § 50, 60 ch 33 SLA 2016; am § 56 ch 3 SLA 2017; am § 2 ch 18 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

47.07.080

. Renumbered in 1983, at which time it was reorganized to alphabetize the defined terms. Reorganized in 1986, 1991, 1992, 1993, and 2022 to maintain alphabetical order.

Sections 1 and 2, ch. 35, SLA 2009 repealed §§ 3 and 7, ch. 52, SLA 2006, which were to have added, effective June 30, 2009, a definition of “adult dental services.”

In 2010, in paragraphs (2) and (14), references to “AS

08.68.850

” were substituted for references to “AS

08.68.410

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

08.68.410

.

The definition of “durable medical device” was renumbered in 2015 and 2018 to maintain alphabetical order.

Section 4, ch. 18, SLA 2020, required the commissioner of health and social services to “notify the revisor of statutes in writing, on or before October 1, 2021, if the United States Department of Health and Human Services approves the amendments to the state plan for medical assistance coverage under . . . AS

47.07.900

(20) [now (16)]” as enacted by sec. 2, ch. 18, SLA 2020. The commissioner of health and social services notified the revisor of statutes on June 1, 2022, that the amendments to the state plan had been approved. Although this notification came after October 1, 2021, the amendments to the state plan were approved on September 20, 2021, so the revisor of statutes gave effect to the change with an effective date of October 2, 2021.

Administrative Code. —

For other services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 26.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, repealed paragraph (6).

The 2004 amendment, effective July 1, 2004, rewrote paragraph (19).

The 2005 amendment, effective October 12, 2005, in paragraph (11) added the subparagraph (A) designation and subparagraph (B).

The 2006 amendment, effective July 1, 2006, repealed a former paragraph (1), which had defined “adult dental services”.

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (11)(A), substituted “persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities” for “the mentally retarded”.

The first 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, in (4), deleted “that receive grants under AS

47.30.520

–

47.30.620

” following “health clinics”; in (17)(A), deleted “that is funded with a grant under AS

47.30.475

” following “treatment center”, in (17)(B), deleted “that has a contract to provide community mental health services under AS

47.30.520

–

47.30.620

” following “health clinic”.

The second 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (2), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner” in two places, substituted “licensed” for “certified”, substituted “regulations adopted under AS

08.68.100(a)

” for “the person’s certified authority”; repealed (14).

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (9), substituted “includes only persons who receive” for “and ‘severely emotionally disturbed persons under age 21’ include only persons who receive”.